California, session 20252026, SB1054.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Better Data, Better Coverage, Better California Act.(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California’s economy depends on a skilled workforce. High-quality labor market information enables policymakers, state agencies, educational institutions, workforce boards, and employers to understand which Californians access training, what outcomes they achieve, where labor shortages persist, and where there are gaps in workforce training opportunities.(2) California’s ability to conduct meaningful workforce analysis is severely limited because the state’s base wage file does not include hours worked or occupational classification. These core data elements are required to assess job quality, evaluate the effectiveness of training programs, verify federal benefit eligibility, and track whether students are able to be employed in their field of study and whether workers enter and remain in priority sectors.(3) A 2025 report by the Strada Education Foundation found that states lacking high-quality labor market data are unable to assess whether workforce programs lead to economic mobility or respond effectively to labor market demand. Adding hours worked and occupational classification to state wage records is foundational to understanding job quality, identifying whether workers advance into higher wage occupations, and evaluating the return on public investments in education and training.(4) California has invested heavily in job training programs, but lacks the data system to evaluate their impact. A 2024 publication by California Competes: Higher Education for a Strong Economy found that the state administers at least 36 major workforce and career pathway programs across 12 public entities, totaling billions of dollars in investment. Currently, the state cannot track whether participants ultimately secure employment in their field of training or region.(5) A 2024 report by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency and the Employment Development Department found that hours worked is an important missing data element for improving the accuracy and usefulness of California’s wage file and related program evaluations, and further found that adding occupational code information would significantly enhance the state’s capacity to analyze regional labor market trends, evaluate training program effectiveness, and understand workforce shortages.(6) A report released in 2025 by the California Cradle-to-Career Data System’s Workforce Data Expansion Task Force concluded that collecting hours worked and occupational classification is essential for strengthening the state’s longitudinal data system, evaluating whether education and workforce investments lead to improved employment outcomes, and supporting the California Education Interagency Council’s responsibility to identify labor gaps and emerging workforce needs by providing available data.(7) The 2025 Master Plan for Career Education calls for improved data to align education and training with labor market demand and to understand whether learners transition into good jobs.(8) The California Legislature, through Senate Bill 638 (Chapter 457 of the Statutes of 2025) and Assembly Bill 1098 (Chapter 446 of the Statutes of 2025), established the California Education Interagency Council and charged it with conducting statewide analyses of labor shortages, assessing whether education and workforce programs align with regional and sectoral needs, and recommending improvements to the state’s talent pipeline. Collecting standardized hours worked and occupational classification data will strengthen the council’s ability to evaluate whether Californians are entering high-demand fields and to make evidence-based recommendations to the Legislature.(9) The need for data has become more urgent in light of the federal enactment of federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) in 2025, which imposes new work requirements for health and food benefits and new costs to the state. For example, federal House Resolution 1 does all of the following:(A) Establishes new Medicaid eligibility requirements by mandating that able-bodied adults 19 to 64 years of age, inclusive, complete 80 hours of work, education, community service, or other qualified activities each month.(B) Imposes stricter Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) participation rules by capping benefits at three months in a three-year period for individuals who do not meet 20 weekly hours of qualifying activities, and expands work requirements to previously exempt groups including former foster youth, veterans, individuals experiencing homelessness, adults 55 to 64 years of age, inclusive, without disabilities, and caregivers of children 14 years of age and older.(C) Shifts a portion of SNAP program costs to states based on their SNAP payment error rate. Given California’s 2024 payment error rate of 10.8 percent, federal House Resolution 1 could require the state to assume a new cost share of up to 15 percent.(D) Imposes more stringent repayment standards for Medicaid errors related to eligibility, which could incur additional costs on the state for failure to appropriately document eligibility verification.(10) Without standardized hours worked data collected and shared by employers to the state, California agencies, counties, and individuals will face a significant administrative burden verifying compliance, increasing the likelihood that eligible Californians lose health and food benefit coverage.(11) Sharing accurate and timely work and earnings data is essential to reduce administrative burden, improve eligibility determinations, lower error rates, and shield the state from increased fiscal responsibility.(12) Collecting hours worked and occupational code information will benefit learners seeking upward mobility, employers struggling to fill critical labor shortages, state agencies administering major public benefit and workforce programs, educational institutions evaluating curricular offerings, and policymakers responsible for ensuring that public investments improve economic mobility and meet California’s regional workforce needs.(13) Federal regulations allow the Employment Development Department to collect hours worked and occupation data. While California studied how to expand this data collection through implementation of Senate Bill 755 (Chapter 815 of the Statutes of 2022), it has not yet required it, stating the need for legislation and an appropriation.(c) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to require the Employment Development Department to collect hours worked and occupational classification as part of employer wage reporting, in a manner that minimizes employer burden, improves data quality, and maximizes cross-program value for California’s education, workforce, and safety net systems.SEC. 2. Section 1088.3 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:1088.3. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Hours worked” means the total hours worked by each worker each month. The employer may report 40 hours worked for each week any duties were performed by a full-time employee and shall report hours paid or a reasonable estimate of the hours worked for each week duties were performed by a part-time employee.(2) “Occupation” means an occupation listed in the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics’ Standard Occupational Classification system or the job title of each worker.(3) “Worker type” means the salaried or hourly, and full-time, part-time, intern, or apprentice, status of each worker.(b) The department shall work with employers to enhance the reporting of employment and earning data by employers as required by this article, consistent with federal law and regulations. To minimize employer reporting burdens, the department, where feasible, shall align and streamline definitions and requirements for the report of wages, deploy user-friendly application programming interfaces, and implement other means to simplify reporting processes.(c) (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, every employer with 10 or more employees and every individual or organization that, as an agent, reports wages on behalf of one or more employers with 10 or more employees, shall include in the report of wages required by Section 1088, information on total monthly wage, industry, occupation, worker type, and hours worked for each employee in a format approved by the department.(2) The information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be filed electronically at least monthly, consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1088, unless the employer receives a waiver pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1088.(d)  On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall adopt and develop appropriate procedures for the sharing of hours worked and other necessary employment data pursuant to subdivisions (as) and (at) of Section 1095.(e) The department shall work with CalSAWS to develop and implement the necessary system changes to implement the data sharing process pursuant to subdivisions (as) and (at) of Section 1095 to verify hours worked as described in subdivision (d).(f)  The department shall work with the Office of the California Education Interagency Council related to the collection of employment data pursuant to subdivisions (as) and subdivision (at) of Section 1095 for the purposes of supporting the council’s agendas, reports, work products, and resources. council’s purposes specified in Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 11900) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall work with the California Workforce Development Board and the Labor and Workforce Development Agency to implement the workforce program reporting requirements contained in Section 14017.1 and shall provide any relevant necessary wage data, inclusive of subdivision (c) of this section, pursuant to subdivision (aj) of Section 1095.(g)  The department may work with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data to support existing state data systems, dashboards, and reports related to the collection of employment data pursuant to subdivision (ap) of Section 1095.(h)  The department shall use existing federal and state grant funds to the extent available and shall implement this section on or before July 1, 2027, except that the department shall begin the data sharing process pursuant to subdivisions (as) and (at) of Section 1095 to verify hours worked as described in subdivision (d), on January 1, 2028, or when the department notifies the Legislature that CalSAWS can perform the necessary automation to implement the data sharing process, whichever is later.SEC. 3. Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:1095. The director shall permit the use of any information in the director’s possession to the extent necessary for any of the following purposes, and may require reimbursement for all direct costs incurred in providing any and all information specified in this section, except information specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive:(a) To enable the director or the director’s representative to carry out their responsibilities under this code.(b) To properly present a claim for benefits.(c) To acquaint a worker or their authorized agent with the worker’s existing or prospective right to benefits.(d) To furnish an employer or their authorized agent with information to enable the employer to fully discharge their obligations or safeguard their rights under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 9000).(e) To enable an employer to receive a reduction in contribution rate.(f) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies, subject to federal law, to verify or determine the eligibility or entitlement of an applicant for, or a recipient of, public social services provided pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), and state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of public social services.(g) To enable county administrators of general relief or assistance, or their representatives, to determine entitlement to locally provided general relief or assistance, when the determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of general relief or assistance.(h) To enable state or local governmental departments or agencies to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, relief provided under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or to enable the collection of expenditures for medical assistance services pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(i) To provide any law enforcement agency with the name, address, telephone number, birth date, social security number, physical description, and names and addresses of present and past employers, of any victim, suspect, missing person, potential witness, or person for whom a felony arrest warrant has been issued, when a request for this information is made by any investigator or peace officer as defined by Sections 830.1 and 830.2 of the Penal Code, or by any federal law enforcement officer to whom the Attorney General has delegated authority to enforce federal search warrants, as defined under Sections 60.2 and 60.3 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, and when the requesting officer has been designated by the head of the law enforcement agency and requests this information in the course of and as a part of an investigation into the commission of a crime when there is a reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the law enforcement agency that employs the person, for filing under the normal procedures of that agency.(1) This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the release to any law enforcement agency of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving benefits.(2) The department shall maintain records pursuant to this subdivision only for periods required under regulations or statutes enacted for the administration of its programs.(3) This subdivision shall not be construed as limiting the information provided to law enforcement agencies to that pertaining only to applicants for, or recipients of, benefits.(4) The department shall notify all applicants for benefits that release of confidential information from their records will not be protected should there be a felony arrest warrant issued against the applicant or in the event of an investigation by a law enforcement agency into the commission of a felony.(j) To provide public employee retirement systems in California with information relating to the earnings of any person who has applied for or is receiving a disability income, disability allowance, or disability retirement allowance, from a public employee retirement system. The earnings information shall be released only upon written request from the governing board specifying that the person has applied for or is receiving a disability allowance or disability retirement allowance from its retirement system. The request may be made by the chief executive officer of the system or by an employee of the system so authorized and identified by name and title by the chief executive officer in writing.(k) To enable the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the failure to pay, or the unlawful payment of, wages pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of, the Labor Code.(l) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies to administer child support enforcement programs under Part D of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).(m) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with wage and claim information in its possession that will assist those departments and agencies in the administration of the Victims of Crime Program or in the location of victims of crime who, by state mandate or court order, are entitled to restitution that has been or can be recovered.(n) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with information concerning any individuals who are or have been:(1) Directed by state mandate or court order to pay restitution, fines, penalties, assessments, or fees as a result of a violation of law.(2) Delinquent or in default on guaranteed student loans or who owe repayment of funds received through other financial assistance programs administered by those agencies. The information released by the director for the purposes of this paragraph shall not include unemployment insurance benefit information.(o) To provide an authorized governmental agency with any and all relevant information that relates to any specific workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations. For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized governmental agency” means the district attorney of any county, the office of the Attorney General, the Contractors State License Board, the Department of Industrial Relations, and the Department of Insurance. An authorized governmental agency may disclose this information to the State Bar of California, the Medical Board of California, or any other licensing board or department whose licensee is the subject of a workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. This subdivision shall not prevent any authorized governmental agency from reporting to any board or department the suspected misconduct of any licensee of that body.(p) To enable the Director of Consumer Affairs, or the director’s representative, to access unemployment insurance quarterly wage data on a case-by-case basis to verify information on school administrators, school staff, and students provided by those schools who are being investigated for possible violations of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(q) To provide employment tax information to the tax officials of Mexico, if a reciprocal agreement exists. For purposes of this subdivision, “reciprocal agreement” means a formal agreement to exchange information between national taxing officials of Mexico and taxing authorities of the State Board of Equalization, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Employment Development Department. Furthermore, the reciprocal agreement shall be limited to the exchange of information that is essential for tax administration purposes only. Taxing authorities of the State of California shall be granted tax information only on California residents. Taxing authorities of Mexico shall be granted tax information only on Mexican nationals.(r) To enable city and county planning agencies to develop economic forecasts for planning purposes. The information shall be limited to businesses within the jurisdiction of the city or county whose planning agency is requesting the information, and shall not include information regarding individual employees.(s) To provide the State Department of Developmental Services with wage and employer information that will assist in the collection of moneys owed by the recipient, parent, or any other legally liable individual for services and supports provided pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4775) of Division 4.5 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7200) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code.(t) To provide the State Board of Equalization with employment tax information that will assist in the administration of tax programs. The information shall be limited to the exchange of employment tax information essential for tax administration purposes to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.(u) This section shall not be construed to authorize or permit the use of information obtained in the administration of this code by any private collection agency.(v) The disclosure of the name and address of an individual or business entity that was issued an assessment that included penalties under Section 1128 or 1128.1 shall not be in violation of Section 1094 if the assessment is final. The disclosure may also include any of the following:(1) The total amount of the assessment.(2) The amount of the penalty imposed under Section 1128 or 1128.1 that is included in the assessment.(3) The facts that resulted in the charging of the penalty under Section 1128 or 1128.1.(w) To enable the Contractors State License Board to verify the employment history of an individual applying for licensure pursuant to Section 7068 of the Business and Professions Code.(x) To provide any peace officer with the Division of Investigation in the Department of Consumer Affairs information pursuant to subdivision (i) when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Division of Investigation and requests this information in the course of and as part of an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(y) To enable the Labor Commissioner of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to identify, pursuant to Section 90.3 of the Labor Code, unlawfully uninsured employers. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.(z) To enable the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in accordance with the requirements of Section 84754.5 of the Education Code, to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing January 1, 1993, on students who have attended one or more community colleges, to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of students, to conduct the annual evaluation of district-level and individual college performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(aa) To enable the Public Employees’ Retirement System to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, benefits provided under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(ab) To enable the State Department of Education, the University of California, the California State University, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, pursuant to the requirements prescribed by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing July 1, 2010, on students who have attended their respective systems to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students, to conduct the annual analysis of district-level and individual district or postsecondary education system performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(ac) To provide the Agricultural Labor Relations Board with employee, wage, and employer information, for use in the investigation or enforcement of the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code). The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(ad) (1) To enable the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Health Benefit Exchange, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies to obtain information regarding employee wages, California employer names and account numbers, employer reports of wages and number of employees, and disability insurance and unemployment insurance claim information, for the purpose of:(A) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state health subsidy programs, limited to the Medi-Cal program provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the Medi-Cal Access Program provided pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the state health subsidy programs referenced in this subparagraph.(B) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, including federal tax credits and cost-sharing assistance pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the California Health Benefit Exchange.(C) Verifying or determining the eligibility of employees and employers for health coverage through the Small Business Health Options Program, provided pursuant to Section 100502 of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the Small Business Health Options Program.(2) The information provided under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of, and provided to the extent permitted by, federal law and regulations, including Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(ae) To provide any peace officer with the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles with information pursuant to subdivision (i), when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Investigations Division and requests this information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud, and there is reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence regarding the identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles, for filing under the normal procedures of that division.(af) Until January 1, 2020, to enable the Department of Finance to prepare and submit the report required by Section 13084 of the Government Code that identifies all employers in California that employ 100 or more employees who receive benefits from the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). The information used for this purpose shall be limited to information obtained pursuant to Section 11026.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and from the administration of personal income tax wage withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) and the disability insurance program and may be disclosed to the Department of Finance only for the purpose of preparing and submitting the report and only to the extent not prohibited by federal law.(ag) To provide, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, the Student Aid Commission with wage information in order to verify the employment status of an individual applying for a Cal Grant C award pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 69439 of the Education Code.(ah) To enable the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to obtain quarterly wage data of former inmates who have been incarcerated within the prison system in order to assess the impact of rehabilitation services or the lack of these services on the employment and earnings of these former inmates. Quarterly data for a former inmate’s employment status and wage history shall be provided for a period of one year, three years, and five years following release. The data shall only be used for the purpose of tracking outcomes for former inmates in order to assess the effectiveness of rehabilitation strategies on the wages and employment histories of those formerly incarcerated. The information shall be provided to the department to the extent not prohibited by federal law.(ai) To enable federal, state, or local government departments or agencies, or their contracted agencies, subject to federal law, including the confidentiality, disclosure, and other requirements set forth in Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to evaluate, research, or forecast the effectiveness of public social services programs administered pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), when the evaluation, research, or forecast is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the public social services programs.(aj) (1) To enable the California Workforce Development Board, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Social Services, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the Employment Training Panel, and a chief elected official, as that term is defined in Section 3102(9) of Title 29 of the United States Code, to access any relevant quarterly wage data necessary for the evaluation and reporting of their respective program performance outcomes as required and permitted by various local, state, and federal laws pertaining to performance measurement and program evaluation, including responsibilities arising under Sections 14013, 14017.1, 14033, and 14042 of this code and Sections 2032 and 2038 of the Streets and Highways Code; the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128); the workforce metrics dashboard pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14013; the Adult Education Block Grant Program consortia performance metrics pursuant to Section 84920 of the Education Code; the economic and workforce development program performance measures pursuant to Section 88650 of the Education Code; and the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program performance measures established in Part 52.5 (commencing with Section 88600) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Disclosures under this subdivision shall comply with federal and state privacy laws that require the informed consent from program participants of city and county departments or agencies that administer public workforce development programs for the evaluation, research, or forecast of their programs regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.(2) The department shall do all of the following:(A) Consistent with this subdivision, develop the minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.(B) Develop a standard application for submitting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision.(C) Approve or deny a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, or request additional information, within 20 business days of receiving the standard application. The entity submitting the application shall respond to any request by the department for additional information within 20 business days of receipt of the department’s request. Within 30 calendar days of receiving any additional information, the department shall provide a final approval or denial of the request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision. Any approval, denial, or request for additional information shall be in writing. Denials shall identify the reason or category of reasons for the denial.(D) Make publicly available on the department’s internet website all of the following:(i) The minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, as developed pursuant to subparagraph (A).(ii) The standard application developed pursuant to subparagraph (B).(iii) The timeframe for information request determinations by the department, as specified in subparagraph (C).(iv) Contact information for assistance with requests for disclosures of information authorized by this subdivision.(v) Any denials for requests of disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, including the reason or category of reasons for the denial.(ak) (1) To provide any peace officer with the Enforcement Branch of the Department of Insurance with both of the following:(A) Information provided pursuant to subdivision (i) that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving automobile insurance fraud, life insurance and annuity fraud, property and casualty insurance fraud, and organized automobile insurance fraud. That information shall be provided when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(B) Employee, wage, employer, and state disability insurance claim information that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving health or disability insurance fraud when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(2) To enable the State Department of Developmental Services to obtain quarterly wage data and unemployment insurance claim data of consumers served by that department for the purposes of monitoring, program operation and evaluation, and evaluating employment outcomes, of the Employment First Policy, established pursuant to Section 4869 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(3) The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(al) To provide the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board with employer tax information for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, the CalSavers Retirement Savings Trust Act (Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code). The information should be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate, and shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.(am) (1) To enable the Joint Enforcement Strike Force as established by Section 329, and the Labor Enforcement Task Force, as established pursuant to Assembly Bill 1464 of the 2011–12 Regular Session (Chapter 21 of the Statutes of 2012), to carry out their duties.(2) To provide an agency listed in subdivision (a) of Section 329 intelligence, data, including confidential tax and fee information, documents, information, complaints, or lead referrals pursuant to Section 15925 of the Government Code.(an) To enable the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education to access and use any relevant quarterly wage data necessary to perform the labor market outcome reporting data match pursuant to Section 94892.6 of the Education Code. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.(ao) To enable the Civil Rights Department to carry out its duties, including ensuring compliance with Section 12999 of the Government Code. Conduct related to information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the criminal sanctions set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1094.(ap) To enable the Cradle-to-Career Data System, as established by Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to receive employment and earnings data and, as required by the director pursuant to Section 10871 of the Education Code, to provide information to the data system, to the extent permissible by federal laws and regulations.(aq) (1) To enable the State Air Resources Board to receive unpaid final tax assessment information issued to a port drayage motor carrier or short-haul trucking service for misclassification of a commercial driver, for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 39680) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code. The information shall be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate for disclosure and shall be provided only to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:(A) “Commercial driver” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.(B) “Port drayage motor carrier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.(C) “Short-haul trucking service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39682 of the Health and Safety Code.(ar) To enable the California Health Benefit Exchange to do all of the following:(1) Notify an employer that an employee has been determined eligible for advance payments of the premium tax credit and cost-sharing reductions and has enrolled in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange, as required pursuant to Section 155.310(h) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.(2) Assist the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services in determining eligibility for the insurance affordability programs administered by those state agencies. The determination of eligibility or entitlement shall include efforts by either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services to assist those individuals in obtaining that coverage, including informing those individuals potentially eligible for health coverage of the availability of that coverage.(3) Verify if a consumer has been offered affordable comprehensive employer-sponsored health care coverage pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code and the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148). The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.(4) Upon the request of either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services, the department shall also provide to the relevant state agency information on new applicants for unemployment insurance, state disability insurance, and paid family leave. The California Health Benefit Exchange and the State Department of Health Care Services shall at all times request from the department the minimum amount of information necessary from the information listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code, to accomplish the purposes of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code. The information shall be sent in a manner that is encrypted or otherwise complies with government data security best practices, as specified by the California Health Benefit Exchange. This information shall only be used for the purposes of outreach and marketing.(5) This subdivision shall become operative no later than September 1, 2023.(as) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, to enable the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services to access access, to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations, hours worked and other necessary employment data to support employment-related verifications for initial eligibility for, and ongoing receipt of, public benefits, including, but not limited to, benefits pursuant to the Medi-Cal program and the CalFresh program.(2) The In implementing this subdivision, the department shall consult with the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS).(at) On or before January 1, 2028, to enable the Office of the California Education Interagency Council to access access, to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations, any relevant wage data necessary for the purposes of supporting the council’s agendas, reports, work products, and resources. council’s purposes specified in Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 11900) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 2 and 3 of this act, which add Section 1088.3 to, and amend Section 1095 of, the Unemployment Insurance Code, impose a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:To ensure adequate privacy protections when collecting and verifying information about wages and benefits, it is necessary to keep individuals’ personally identifiable information confidential.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.